Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0111

Business transactions of member with limited cooperative association.

Subject to RCW 23.100.0618 and 23.100.0619 and except as otherwise provided in the organic rules or a specific contract relating to a transaction, a member may lend money to and transact other business with a limited cooperative association in the same manner as a person that is not a member.

[ 2019 c 37 s 111.]